Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that including blood type information on drivers' licenses and identification cards can enhance emergency medical response, saving time and potentially lives in critical situations. This act is intended to provide individuals the option to voluntarily include their blood type on their state-issued identification documents.Sec. 2. RCW 46.20.117 and 2024 c 315 s 4 and 2024 c 162 s 3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Issuance. The department shall issue an identicard, containing a picture, if the applicant:(a) Does not hold a valid Washington driver's license;(b) Proves the applicant's identity as required by RCW 46.20.035; and(c) Pays the required fee. Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the fee is $72, unless an applicant is:(i) A recipient of continuing public assistance grants under Title 74 RCW, or a participant in the Washington women, infants, and children program. Any applicant under this subsection must be verified by documentation sufficient to demonstrate eligibility;(ii) Under the age of 25 and does not have a permanent residence address as determined by the department by rule; or(iii) An individual who is scheduled to be released from an institution as defined in RCW 13.40.020, a community facility as defined in RCW 72.05.020, a correctional facility as defined in RCW 72.09.015, or other juvenile rehabilitation facility operated by the department of social and health services or the department of children, youth, and families; or an individual who has been released from such an institution or facility within 30 calendar days before the date of the application.For those persons under (c)(i) through (iii) of this subsection, the fee must be the actual cost of production of the identicard.(2)(a) Design and term. The identicard must:(i) Be distinctly designed so that it will not be confused with the official driver's license; and(ii) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, expire on the eighth anniversary of the applicant's birthdate after issuance.(b) The identicard may include the person's status as a veteran, consistent with RCW 46.20.161(4).(c) If applicable, the identicard may include a medical alert designation as provided in subsection (5) of this section.(d) If applicable, the identicard may include an optional blood type designation consistent with RCW 46.20.161(2)(j).(3) Renewal. An application for identicard renewal may be submitted by means of:(a) Personal appearance before the department;(b) Mail or electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the department and if the applicant did not renew the identicard by mail or by electronic commerce when it last expired; or(c) From January 1, 2022, to June 30, 2024, electronic commerce, if permitted by rule of the department.An identicard may not be renewed by mail or by electronic commerce unless the renewal issued by the department includes a photograph of the identicard holder.(4) Cancellation. The department may cancel an identicard if the holder of the identicard used the card or allowed others to use the card in violation of RCW 46.20.0921.(5) Any person may apply to the department to obtain a medical alert designation, a developmental disability designation, or a deafness designation on an identicard issued under this chapter by providing:(a) Self-attestation that the individual:(i) Has a medical condition that could affect communication or account for a health emergency;(ii) Is deaf or hard of hearing; or(iii) Has a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;(b) A statement from the person that they have voluntarily provided the self-attestation and other information verifying the condition; and(c) For persons under 18 years of age or who have a developmental disability, the signature of a parent or legal guardian.(6) A self-attestation or data contained in a self-attestation provided under this section:(a) Shall not be disclosed; and(b) Is for the confidential use of the director, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and law enforcement and emergency medical service providers as designated by law.(7) Alternative issuance/renewal/extension. The department may issue or renew an identicard for a period other than eight years, or may extend by mail or electronic commerce an identicard that has already been issued. The fee for an identicard issued or renewed for a period other than eight years, or that has been extended by mail or electronic commerce, is $9 for each year that the identicard is issued, renewed, or extended. The department must offer the option to issue or renew an identicard for six years in addition to the eight year issuance. The department may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.(8) Identicard photos must be updated in the same manner as driver's license photos under RCW 46.20.120(5).Sec. 3. RCW 46.20.161 and 2024 c 146 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department, upon receipt of a fee of ((seventy-two dollars))$72, unless the driver's license is issued for a period other than eight years, in which case the fee shall be ((nine dollars))$9 for each year that the license is issued, which includes the fee for the required photograph, shall issue to every qualifying applicant a driver's license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age of ((eighteen))18 is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions imposed under RCW 46.20.075, until the person reaches the age of ((eighteen))18.(2) The license must include:(a) A distinguishing number assigned to the licensee;(b) The name of record;(c) Date of birth;(d) Washington residence address;(e) Photograph;(f) A brief description of the licensee;(g) Either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write the licensees' usual signature with pen and ink immediately upon receipt of the license;(h) If applicable, the person's status as a veteran as provided in subsection (4) of this section; ((and))(i) If applicable, a medical alert designation as provided in subsection (5) of this section; and(j) At the option of the licensee, the inclusion of the licensee's blood type, provided that the licensee presents documentation verifying the blood type from a licensed physician, medical facility, or blood donation organization.(3) No license is valid until it has been signed by the licensee.(4)(a) A veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, may apply to the department to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license issued under this section by providing:(i) A United States department of veterans affairs identification card or proof of service letter;(ii) A United States department of defense discharge document, DD Form 214 or DD Form 215, as it exists on June 7, 2018, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that establishes the person's service in the armed forces of the United States and qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005;(iii) A national guard state-issued report of separation and military service, NGB Form 22, as it exists on June 7, 2018, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the department by rule, consistent with the purposes of this section, or equivalent or successor discharge paperwork, that establishes the person's active duty or reserve service in the national guard and qualifying discharge as defined in RCW 73.04.005; or(iv) A United States uniformed services identification card, DD Form 2, that displays on its face that it has been issued to a retired member of any of the armed forces of the United States, including the national guard and armed forces reserves.(b) The department may permit a veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.007, to submit alternate forms of documentation to apply to obtain a veteran designation on a driver's license.(5) Any person may apply to the department to obtain a medical alert designation, a developmental disability designation, or a deafness designation on a driver's license issued under this chapter by providing:(a) Self-attestation that the individual:(i) Has a medical condition that could affect communication or account for a driver health emergency;(ii) Is deaf or hard of hearing; or(iii) Has a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020;(b) A statement from the person that they have voluntarily provided the self-attestation and other information verifying the condition; and(c) For persons under ((eighteen))18 years of age or who have a developmental disability, the signature of a parent or legal guardian.(6) A self-attestation or data contained in a self-attestation provided under this section:(a) Shall not be disclosed;(b) Is for the confidential use of the director, the chief of the Washington state patrol, and law enforcement and emergency medical service providers as designated by law; and(c) Is subject to the privacy protections of the driver's privacy protection act, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2725.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department shall develop processes and forms to enable individuals to submit blood type documentation when applying for or renewing a driver's license or identicard.(2) The department may charge a one-time administrative fee not to exceed $2 for processing the initial blood type designation request for an individual.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:The department shall coordinate with health care providers, emergency responders, and blood donation organizations to educate the public about the availability and potential benefits of including blood type information on state-issued identification.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:The department is authorized to adopt rules necessary to implement this act including, but not limited to, specifying acceptable forms of blood type documentation and updating existing systems.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---